Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. The Department of Fish and Game.

Sec. 16.05.010.
Commissioner of fish and game.

The commissioner is the principal executive officer of the Department of Fish and Game. The commissioner shall be a qualified executive with knowledge of the requirements for the protection, management, conservation, and restoration of the fish and game resources of the state.

History.

(§ 4 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 1996)

Sec. 16.05.020.
Functions of commissioner.

The commissioner shall

supervise and control the department, and may appoint and employ division heads, enforcement agents, and the technical, clerical, and other assistants necessary for the general administration of the department;

manage, protect, maintain, improve, and extend the fish, game and aquatic plant resources of the state in the interest of the economy and general well-being of the state;

have necessary power to accomplish the foregoing including, but not limited to, the power to delegate authority to subordinate officers and employees of the department.

History.

(§ 4 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 32, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 34, art. 1.

For applicability of regulations, see 5 AAC 40, art. 3.

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

For regional comprehensive planning, see 5 AAC 40, art. 5.

For aquatic farming, see 5 AAC 41, art. 4.

For aquarium stocking, see 5 AAC 41, art. 5.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For educational fishery program, see 5 AAC 93, art. 2.

For salmon use, see 5 AAC 93, art. 3.

For salmon fishery associations, see 5 AAC 93, art. 4.

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The commissioner of fish and game had the power to adopt procedural rules to implement former AS

16.05.870

and to establish by regulation the standards under which permits were to be issued under former AS

16.05.870

.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen. [AS 16.05.870 was repealed by E.O. 107 (2003).]

Under existing statutory and regulatory provisions the progeny of birds held in captivity under a collecting permit from the Department of Fish and Game do not automatically become the property of the permittee; they remain subject to the same ownership interest the state retains in the adults, unless the permit and applicable regulations specify otherwise. Oct. 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is well within the authority of the Board of Game under AS

16.05.255(a)

and the Department of Fish and Game under this section to determine by regulation the point at which certain animals are deemed feral and subject to whatever game regulations the board may wish to adopt.
A board or departmental regulation defining “feral animal” would be applicable statewide regardless of land ownership.
July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

In light of the commissioner’s statutory charge to “manage, protect, maintain, improve, and extend the fish . . . resources of the state,” emergency orders can be issued to protect sustained yield, based on conservation concerns. Aug. 1, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.030.
Status of commissioner. [Repealed, § 40 ch 206 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.040.
Compensation of commissioner.

The commissioner is entitled to the compensation fixed by law and, subject to appropriate state travel regulations, is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties.

History.

(§ 5 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.05.050.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner has, but not by way of limitation, the following powers and duties:

through the appropriate state agency and under the provisions of AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), to acquire by gift, purchase, or lease, or other lawful means, land, buildings, water, rights-of-way, or other necessary or proper real or personal property when the acquisition is in the interest of furthering an objective or purpose of the department and the state;

under the provisions of AS 36.30, to design and construct hatcheries, pipelines, rearing ponds, fishways, and other projects beneficial for the fish and game resources of the state;

to accept money from any person under conditions requiring the use of the money for specific purposes in the furtherance of the protection, rehabilitation, propagation, preservation, or investigation of the fish and game resources of the state or in settlement of claims for damages to fish or game resources;

to collect, classify, and disseminate statistics, data and information that, in the commissioner’s discretion, will tend to promote the purposes of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52;

to take, capture, propagate, transport, buy, sell, or exchange fish or game or eggs for propagating, scientific, public safety, or stocking purposes;

under the provisions of AS 36.30, to provide public facilities where necessary or proper to facilitate the taking of fish or game, and to enter into cooperative agreements with any person to effect them;

to exercise administrative, budgeting, and fiscal powers;

under the provisions of AS 36.30, to construct, operate, supervise, and maintain vessels used by the department;

to authorize the holder of an interim-use permit under AS 16.43 to engage on an experimental basis in commercial taking of a fishery resource with vessel, gear, and techniques not presently qualifying for licensing under this chapter in conformity with standards established by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission;

not later than January 31 of each year, to provide to the commissioner of revenue the names of those fish and shellfish species that the commissioner of fish and game designates as developing commercial fish species for that calendar year; a fish or shellfish species is a developing commercial fish species if, within a specified geographical region,

the optimum yield from the harvest of the species has not been reached;

a substantial portion of the allowable harvest of the species has been allocated to fishing vessels of a foreign nation; or

a commercial harvest of the fish species has recently developed;

to initiate or conduct research necessary or advisable to carry out the purposes of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52;

to enter into cooperative agreements with agencies of the federal government, educational institutions, or other agencies or organizations, when in the public interest, to carry out the purposes of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52;

to implement an on-board observer program authorized by the Board of Fisheries under AS

16.05.251(a)(13)

; implementation

must be as unintrusive to vessel operations as practicable; and

must make scheduling and scope of observers’ activities as predictable as practicable;

to sell fish caught during commercial fisheries test fishing operations;

to establish and charge fees equal to the cost of services provided by the department, including provision of public shooting ranges, broodstock and eggs for private nonprofit hatcheries, department publications, and other direct services, and reasonable fees for the use of state facilities managed by the department; fees established under this paragraph for tours of hatchery facilities, commercial use of sport fishing access sites, and for operation of state hatchery facilities by private aquaculture associations are not subject to the cost limit under AS

37.10.050(a)

;

to permit and regulate aquatic farming in the state in a manner that ensures the protection of the state’s fish and game resources and improves the economy, health, and well-being of the citizens of the state;

to operate state housing and facilities for employees, contractors, and others in support of the department’s responsibilities and to charge rent that is consistent with applicable collective bargaining agreements, or, if no collective bargaining agreement is applicable, competitive with market conditions; rent received from tenants shall be deposited in the general fund;

to petition the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission, unless the Board of Fisheries disapproves the petition under AS

16.05.251(g)

, to establish a moratorium on new entrants into commercial fisheries

that have experienced recent increases in fishing effort that are beyond a low, sporadic level of effort;

that have achieved a level of harvest that may be approaching or exceeding the maximum sustainable level for the fishery; and

for which there is insufficient biological and resource management information necessary to promote the conservation and sustained yield management of the fishery;

to promote fishing, hunting, and trapping and preserve the heritage of fishing, hunting, and trapping in the state.

The commissioner shall annually submit a report to the

Board of Game regarding the department’s implementation during the preceding three years of intensive management programs that have been established by the board under AS

16.05.255

for identified big game prey populations;

legislature regarding the Board of Game’s allocation of big game hunting opportunities in the preceding calendar year; the commissioner shall file the report with the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before February 1 and notify the legislature that the report is available; the report must include

a summary description of the big game hunting opportunities provided to residents and nonresidents;

a detailed description of how big game hunting opportunities for each big game species were allocated

to residents, guided nonresidents, nonprofit organizations for auction under AS

16.05.343(a)

and (c), and, if applicable, nonguided nonresidents;

by hunt type;

within each game management unit; and

other information and data relevant to allocation of big game hunting opportunities in the state by the Board of Game.

History.

(§§ 6, 11 art I ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 227 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 12 ch 79 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 29 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 145 SLA 1988; am §§ 19, 20 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 211 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1991; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings relating to the 1998 enactment of subsection (b), see § 1, ch. 76, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2005 addition of paragraph (a)(19), see § 1,
ch. 87, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
For House letter of intent concerning the deletion of former paragraph (1) in
ch. 87, SLA 2005, see 2005 House Journal 1814.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska Peninsula-Aleutian Islands Area (Registration Area M), see 5 AAC 27, art. 10.

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

For scope of regulations, see 5 AAC 41, art. 1.

For aquatic farming, see 5 AAC 41, art. 4.

For Anchorage Bowl Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 59.

For Knik Arm Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 60.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For salmon fishery associations, see 5 AAC 93, art. 4.

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Paragraph (5) and former AS 16.05.331(b) (now see AS

16.40.050

) imply authority for the Department of Fish and Game to interpret the term “elk” and to limit it to specific species, subspecies, or other classifications of animals that would commonly be thought of in the United States as “elk.” Jan. 18, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Since test fishing is not commerical fishing, fishermen who are injured while they are test fishing are not entitled to the benefits of the Fishermen’s Fund. Feb. 17, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.

The commissioner of fish and game has the power to adopt procedural rules to implement AS

16.05.870

and to establish by regulation the standards under which permits will be issued under AS

16.05.870

.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen. [AS 16.05.870 was repealed by E.O. 107 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.052.
Nuisance moose.

The department shall avoid destruction of nuisance moose if a practicable alternative exists for the relocation of the moose to suitable habitat where the moose will not be a nuisance. The commissioner may authorize one or more private individuals or groups to relocate nuisance moose to suitable habitat designated by the department if, upon review and evaluation of a written application and proposal, the commissioner finds that the individual or group is qualified to relocate nuisance moose without undue danger to the public, themselves, or the moose. Before relocating nuisance moose, an authorized individual or group shall provide financial assurances acceptable to the commissioner that will cover the state’s reasonable anticipated costs of the relocation and indemnify the state for liability for damages to private persons and property arising from the actions of the individual or group in relocating nuisance moose under this section. The authorized individual or group shall reimburse the state for its costs that arise from relocating nuisance moose. A civil action to recover damages or costs that arise from relocating nuisance moose may not be brought against the state or a political subdivision, officer, or employee of the state. If darts containing narcotics are used to tranquilize moose, all of the darts shall be recovered and properly disposed. In this section, “nuisance moose” means moose designated by the department in an area of concentrated human population that pose a significant risk to the health, safety, or economic well-being of persons in the area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 2004)

Sec. 16.05.053.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990. For current law, see AS 37.05.142 — 37.05.144.]

Sec. 16.05.055.
On-board observer program.

The commissioner may enter into appropriate contracts and agreements with agencies, such as the National Marine Fisheries Service, the North Pacific Fishery Management Council, and the International Pacific Halibut Commission, designed to ensure that on-board observer programs conducted in the fisheries of the state are coordinated and consistent with each other for vessels operating in state and federal water.

The master of a vessel, as a condition of participating in a fishery for which an on-board observer program is authorized by the Board of Fisheries under AS

16.05.251

, shall consent in writing to the placement of an observer aboard the vessel.

History.

(§ 3 ch 76 SLA 1986)

Sec. 16.05.060.
Emergency orders.

This chapter does not limit the power of the commissioner or an authorized designee, when circumstances require, to summarily open or close seasons or areas or to change weekly closed periods on fish or game by means of emergency orders.

The commissioner or an authorized designee may, under criteria adopted by the Board of Fisheries, summarily increase or decrease sport fish bag limits or modify methods of harvest for sport fish by means of emergency orders.

An emergency order has the force and effect of law after field announcement by the commissioner or an authorized designee. An emergency order adopted under this section is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 12 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 78, SLA 1989 added a new subsection (b) to this section. The new subsection contained the sentence set out above as (b) and two other sentences which duplicated the second and third sentences of the section as it existed before the amendment.
When incorporating the 1989 amendment into this section, the first sentence of the existing text was designated as (a), and the second and third sentences were designated as (c).
The second and third sentences of § 1, ch. 78, SLA 1989 were not codified.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For Norton Sound-Port Clarence Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 3.

For Yukon-Northern Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 4.

For Kuskokwim Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 5.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 6.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 11.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 12.

For Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 13.

For Southeastern Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 14.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 3, art. 3.

For sheefish fishery, see 5 AAC 3, art. 6.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 4, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 5, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 6, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 7, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 9, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 12, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 15, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 18, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 24, art. 3.

For Southeastern Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 27, art. 4.

For Prince William Sound Area (Registration Area E), see 5 AAC 27, art. 6.

For Cook Inlet Area (Registration Area H), see 5 AAC 27, art. 7.

For Kodiak Area (Registration Area K), see 5 AAC 27, art. 8.

For Chignik Area (Registration Area L), see 5 AAC 27, art. 9.

For Alaska Peninsula-Aleutian Islands Area (Registration Area M), see 5 AAC 27, art. 10.

For Bristol Bay Area (Registration Area T), see 5 AAC 27, art. 12.

For Kuskokwim Area (Registration Area W), see 5 AAC 27, art. 13.

For Bering Sea-Kotzebue Area (Registration Area Q), see 5 AAC 27, art. 14.

For Eastern Gulf of Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 28, art. 4.

For Prince William Sound Area (Registration Area E), see 5 AAC 28, art. 5.

For Cook Inlet Area (Registration Area H), see 5 AAC 28, art. 6.

For Kodiak Area (Registration Area K), see 5 AAC 28, art. 7.

For Chignik Area (Registration Area L), see 5 AAC 28, art. 8.

For South Alaska Peninsula Area (Registration Area M), see 5 AAC 28, art. 9.

For Bering Sea — Aleutian Islands Area (Registration Area O), see 5 AAC 28, art. 10.

For fishing seasons and periods, see 5 AAC 29, art. 4.

For fishery management plans, see 5 AAC 29, art. 5.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 30, art. 3.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 31, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 31, art. 5.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 31, art. 10.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 32, art. 1.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 33, art. 3.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 34, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 34, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 34, art. 6.

For Registration Area K (Kodiak), see 5 AAC 34, art. 9.

For Registration Area M (Alaska Peninsula), see 5 AAC 34, art. 10.

For Registration Area O (Aleutian Islands Area), see 5 AAC 34, art. 11.

For Registration Area T (Bristol Bay), see 5 AAC 34, art. 13.

For Registration Area Q (Bering Sea), see 5 AAC 34, art. 14.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 35, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 35, art. 5.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 35, art. 8.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 35, art. 10.

For seasons, see 5 AAC 37, art. 2.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 38, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 38, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 38, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 38, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 38, art. 8.

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

For permit system established, see 5 AAC 41, art. 2.

For aquarium stocking, see 5 AAC 41, art. 5.

For Southeast Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 47.

For Upper Copper River and Upper Susitna River Area, see 5 AAC 52.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 55.

For Kenai Peninsula Area, see 5 AAC 56.

For Kenai River Drainage Area, see 5 AAC 57.

For Cook Inlet — Resurrection Bay Saltwater Area, see 5 AAC 58.

For Anchorage Bowl Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 59.

For Knik Arm Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 60.

For Susitna River Drainage Area, see 5 AAC 61.

For West Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 62.

For Alaska Peninsula and Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 65.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 67.

For Arctic-Yukon-Kuskokwim Region, see 5 AAC 70.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 6.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 11.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 12.

For Southeastern Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 14.

For trapping seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 84, art. 7.

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no reason why the Department of Fish and Game could not issue different categories of emergency orders under this section in cases of, for example, true biological emergency, and possible “field” orders for other situations, although it would be advisable to adopt a regulation describing how the department intends to apply this section.
Also, it probably would be advisable for clarity’s sake to include the statutory cite in the title of the order — “AS

16.05.060

emergency order” and “AS

16.05.060

field order.” July 27, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.065.
Application extension.

The commissioner shall extend the time and dates during which application may be made for fish or game registration if the commissioner finds that

the conservation and management of the fish or game resource will not be affected adversely; and

the failure to timely apply is the result of excusable neglect.

The fee for an extension granted under this section is $45.

As used in this section, “excusable neglect” does not include unfamiliarity with or ignorance of applicable laws and regulations. In order to show excusable neglect, a person must have demonstrated, before the registration deadline, an intent to harvest fish or game.

History.

(§ 2 ch 196 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1977)

Sec. 16.05.070.
Regulations as evidence.

Regulations of a board and of the commissioner, including emergency openings and closures, are admissible as evidence in the courts of the state in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 13 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.05.080.
Limitation of power.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes the department or a board to change the amount of fees or licenses.

History.

(§ 14 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.05.090.
Organization of the department.

The commissioner may, with the approval of the governor, establish a departmental division of commercial fisheries, a departmental division of sport fisheries, a departmental division of game, and other departmental divisions as are necessary.

[Repealed, § 3 E.O. No. 86 (1993).]

There is established in the department a section of subsistence hunting and fishing.

History.

(§ 15 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 151 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 86 § 3 (1993))

Editor’s notes. —

In a memorandum signed April 14, 1981, the governor approved the commissioner’s conferral of full division status on the section of subsistence hunting and fishing.

Sec. 16.05.092.
Fisheries rehabilitation, enhancement, and development.

The department shall

develop and continually maintain a comprehensive, coordinated state plan for the orderly present and long-range rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of all aspects of the state’s fisheries for the perpetual use, benefit, and enjoyment of all citizens and revise and update this plan annually;

encourage the investment by private enterprise in the technological development and economic utilization of the fisheries resources;

through rehabilitation, enhancement, and development programs do all things necessary to ensure perpetual and increasing production and use of the food resources of state waters and continental shelf areas;

prepare a comprehensive annual report, containing detailed information regarding its accomplishments under this section and proposals of plans and activities for the next fiscal year, and notify the legislature not later than 20 days after the convening of each regular session that the report is available.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 86 § 2 (1993); am § 17 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of regulations, see 5 AAC 40, art. 3.

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

For regional comprehensive planning, see 5 AAC 40, art. 5.

For aquatic farming, see 5 AAC 41, art. 4.

Sec. 16.05.094.
Duties of section of subsistence hunting and fishing.

The section of subsistence hunting and fishing shall

compile existing data and conduct studies to gather information, including data from subsistence users, on all aspects of the role of subsistence hunting and fishing in the lives of the residents of the state;

quantify the amount, nutritional value, and extent of dependence on food acquired through subsistence hunting and fishing;

make information gathered available to the public, appropriate agencies, and other organized bodies;

assist the department, the Board of Fisheries, and the Board of Game in determining what uses of fish and game, as well as which users and what methods, should be termed subsistence uses, users, and methods;

evaluate the impact of state and federal laws and regulations on subsistence hunting and fishing and, when corrective action is indicated, make recommendations to the department;

make recommendations to the Board of Game and the Board of Fisheries regarding adoption, amendment, and repeal of regulations affecting subsistence hunting and fishing;

participate with other divisions in the preparation of statewide and regional management plans so that those plans recognize and incorporate the needs of subsistence users of fish and game.

History.

(§ 3 ch 151 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, “recognize” was substituted for “reorganize” in subsection (7), to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent, see § 1, ch. 151, SLA 1978, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

In a memorandum signed April 14, 1981, the governor approved the commissioner’s conferral of full division status on the section of subsistence hunting and fishing.

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent of the House Special Committee on Subsistence in connection with ch. 151, SLA 1978 (HB 960), see 1978 House Journal, p. 1154.

Sec. 16.05.100.
Fish and game fund established.

There is created a revolving fish and game fund, which shall be used exclusively for the following:

to carry out the purposes and provisions of this title, except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, or other duties that may be delegated by the legislature to the commissioner or the department;

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

to carry out the purposes and objectives within the scope of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52 as may be directed by the donor of any such funds.

History.

(§ 17 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 2005)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The dedication under this section was created subsequent to the date of the ratification of the Alaska Constitution, art. IX, § 7; hence, there was no protection for the fund under the grandfather clause.
However, the fund was protected by the fact that federal law requires dedication of fishing and hunting license proceeds. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

The dedication of proceeds of fishing and hunting licenses to the operation of the Department of Fish and Game is required by federal law for participation in federal programs and is therefore authorized by
art. IX, § 7, of the state constitution. November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.110.
Composition of fund.

The fish and game fund shall be made up of the following money and other money the legislature appropriates, which shall be deposited and retained in the fund until expended:

money received from the sale of state sport fishing, hunting, and trapping licenses, tags, and special permits, waterfowl conservation tags purchased by hunters, and anadromous salmon tags purchased by fishermen;

proceeds received from the sale of furs, skins, and specimens taken by predator hunters and other employees;

money received in settlement of a claim or loss caused by damage to the fish and game resources of the state;

money received from federal, state, or other governmental unit, or from a private donor for fish and game purposes;

interest earned upon money in the fund;

money from any other source.

Except for money received as fisheries fines or forfeitures in settlement of a claim or loss caused by damage to the fish resources of the state that is appropriated to or through the division of commercial fisheries management and development, appropriations of money from the fish and game fund and of money received by the state under the federal aid acts described under AS

16.05.140

shall be made to the division of wildlife conservation or the division of sport fish. The division of wildlife conservation or the division of sport fish may use money appropriated under this subsection to acquire administrative and other services from other agencies if the division acquires the services through reimbursable services agreements. The division of wildlife conservation and the division of sport fish shall include as part of their budgets prepared under AS

37.07.050

a listing of the reimbursable services agreements that are to be funded with money appropriated under this subsection;

a description of the services to be provided under those agreements; and

a listing of the entities that are parties to those agreements.

History.

(§ 17 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings relating to the 1998 enactment of subsection (b), see § 1, ch. 76, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For discussion of constitutionality under art. IX, § 7, of the state constitution of dedication of interest income to the Fish and Game Fund, see November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.120.
Disbursement of funds.

Upon authorization of the commissioner, disbursements from the fish and game fund shall be paid by the proper state officer on presentation of vouchers signed by the commissioner or an authorized representative, and approved by the proper state officer.

History.

(§ 17 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.05.130.
Diversion of funds prohibited; separate accounts.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, money accruing to the state from sport fishing, hunting, and trapping licenses, tags, or permit fees may not be diverted to a purpose other than the protection, propagation, investigation, and restoration of sport fish and game resources and the expenses of administering the sport fish and game divisions of the department.

Money accruing to the state from waterfowl conservation tag fees from hunters may not be diverted to a purpose other than (1) the conservation and enhancement of waterfowl; (2) the acquisition, by lease or otherwise, of wetlands that are important for waterfowl and public use of waterfowl in the state; (3) waterfowl related projects approved by the commissioner; (4) the administration of the waterfowl conservation program; and (5) emergencies in the state as determined by the governor. The department shall maintain a state waterfowl tag fee account within the fish and game fund to permit separate accounting records for the receipt and expenditure of money derived from the sale of waterfowl tags. The department shall prepare a report before April 15 of each even-numbered year for the public and the legislature on the use of money derived from waterfowl conservation tags and limited edition prints. The department shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

Money accruing to the state from the sale of resident trapping licenses may only be used for furbearer management. The department shall maintain a furbearer management account within the fish and game fund under AS

16.05.100

for separate accounting of receipt and expenditure of money from the sale of resident trapping licenses. Furbearer management shall be designed to enhance the furbearer population, increase the productivity of furbearer habitats, initiate useful furbearer research, and educate trappers consistent with the goal to provide for an optimum population of furbearers.

Revenue from the sale of general hunting, trapping, and fishing licenses and tags together with the federal matching funds from Pittman — Robertson, Dingell — Johnson/Wallop — Breaux programs shall be allocated by the department to programs intended to directly benefit license purchasers of general hunting, trapping, and fishing licenses. The department shall prepare an annual report by project of expenditures from the fish and game fund and notify the legislature that the report is available.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Money accruing to the state from the intensive management surcharge imposed under AS

16.05.340(k)

shall be deposited in a separate account known as the sustainable wildlife account in the fish and game fund. Money in the sustainable wildlife account shall be allocated to intensive management programs intended to sustain and enhance big game prey populations under AS

16.05.255(e)

.

History.

(§ 18 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 96 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 211 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 126 SLA 1994; am §§ 18, 19 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 15 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (b). Relettered in 1984.

Section 33,
ch. 18, SLA 2016, would have repealed subsection (g), effective December 31, 2022; however, section 33 was subsequently repealed by sec. 1,
ch. 26, SLA 2021, effective November 23, 2021, which had the effect of continuing subsection (g).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (g).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The primary, if not the sole, purpose of this section is to make possible the procurement of federal matching money.
A provision for nondiversion of funds is a condition precedent to obtaining federal assistance under 16 U.S.C. §§ 669, 777. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

A temporary use of money in the fish and game fund under particular circumstances, wherein repayment is to be made pursuant to a contract with the federal government, is not a diversion within the meaning of this section. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Sec. 16.05.140.
Assent to provisions of federal aid acts.

The state assents to the Federal Aid to Wildlife Restoration Act of September 2, 1937 (16 U.S.C. 669-669j), to the Federal Aid in Fish Restoration Act of August 9, 1950 (16 U.S.C. 777-777k), to any amendment, revision, or modification of either Act, and to any other federal aid act that may be enacted to benefit the state. It is desired that the department participate in the federal aid programs on the same basis as other states.

History.

(§ 20 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Editor’s notes —

16 U.S.C. 669j has been repealed.

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.150.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are peace officers of the state and they shall enforce this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52:

an employee of the department authorized by the commissioner;

a police officer in the state;

any other person authorized by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 21 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where the military does not assign sufficient personnel to enforce fish and game laws on military reservations, state game officials as well might enforce them, possibly by deputizing state game officials as federal marshals, since 10 U.S.C. 2671(c) makes violation of state fish and game laws a federal offense. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Since state fish and game laws operate on a federal military reservation, not only as federal law but also as state law, both the federal and state officers may enforce these laws. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

State officers should have full access to military reservations in Alaska, subject to safety and military security requirements, to enforce laws and manage and harvest fish and game resources. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

There is no provision in the Alaska Statutes or the Alaska Constitution which would operate to deprive the commissioner of fish and game of his authority to deputize peace officers under this section.
However there is nothing to prevent the governor, as a matter of state policy, from subjecting Department of Fish and Game personnel to the qualifications and standards adopted by the Alaska Police Standards Council under AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

or from otherwise limiting the commissioner’s deputization power.
March 29, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Employees of the department and other persons authorized by the commissioner of fish and game to act as peace officers under this section do not thereby acquire general peace officer authority to enforce all other state criminal laws, except where in enforcing this chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder, circumstances necessitate the exercise of additional law enforcement authority and then only to the extent necessary to enforce that chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder. September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Public Safety, division of fish and wildlife protection, has enforcement authority over all criminal matters of the state, civil matters arising under this title, and guide regulation violations.
June 19, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

A Department of Fish and Game employee who is designated by the Commissioner of Fish and Game as a “peace officer” under AS

16.05.150

is not also a “peace officer” under AS

14.43.085

, so that a dependent can obtain free tuition at state supported educational institutions if the employee dies in the line of duty. The statutory framework of the Alaska Statutes viewed as a whole comtemplates that for any publicly employed law enforcement officer to be considered a peace officer within the meaning of AS

01.10.060

(7), he or she must be empowered with a full range of police duties and authority and must be currently functioning on essentially a full-time basis in that role. Designated fish and game employees are not peace officers for purposes of AS

01.10.060

because they do not spend substantially all of their working hours on law enforcement duties. June 25, 1998 Op. Att’y Gen.